Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,228
Vehicle proceeding in forward motion; backup lights on; prohibited; violation; penalty.

No vehicle shall be operated while proceeding in a forward motion with the backup lights on when the vehicle is being operated on the highways. Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1969, c. 327, § 8, p. 1172;

C.S.Supp.,1972, § 39-788.07;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,154;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 324.